Utah statutes.
34A-2-207.   Noncompliance -- Civil action by employees.
(1) (a)  Employers who fail to comply with Section 34A-2-201 are not entitled
to the benefits of this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act,
during the period of noncompliance, but shall be liable in a civil action to
their employees for damages suffered by reason of personal injuries arising
out of or in the course of employment caused by the wrongful act, neglect, or
default of the employer or any of the employer's officers, agents, or
employees, and also to the dependents or personal representatives of such
employees when death results from such injuries.
(b)  In any action described in Subsection (1)(a), the defendant may not avail
himself of any of the following defenses:
(i)  the fellow-servant rule;
(ii)  assumption of risk; or
(iii)  contributory negligence.
(2)  Proof of the injury shall constitute prima facie evidence of negligence
on the part of the employer and the burden shall be upon the employer to show
freedom from negligence resulting in the injury.
(3)  An employer who fails to comply with Section 34A-2-201 is subject to
Sections 34A-2-208 and 34A-2-212.
(4)  In any civil action permitted under this section against the employer,
the employee shall be entitled to necessary costs and a reasonable attorney
fee assessed against the employer.
